Washington statutes.
RCW 19.190.040

Violations—Damages.

(1) Damages to the recipient of a commercial electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message sent in violation of this chapter are five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater.

(2) Damages to an interactive computer service resulting from a violation of this chapter are one thousand dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater.

[ 2003 c 137 s 5; 1998 c 149 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 137: See note following RCW 19.190.060.